Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-168
Inclusion of lands; result of vote; duty of board.

If at such election a majority of all the votes cast at the election shall be against such change of the boundaries of the district, the board shall order that the petition be denied, and shall proceed no further in that matter. If a majority of such votes be in favor of such change of the boundaries of the district, the board shall thereupon order the boundaries of the district to be changed in accordance with the resolutions adopted by the board.

Laws 1895, c. 70, § 41, p. 294;

R.S.1913, § 3499;

C.S.1922, § 2899;

C.S.1929, § 46-144;

R.S.1943, § 46-168;

Laws 1955, c. 182, § 2, p. 513.